District of Columbia statutes.
8-1777.01

Energy reduction.

(a)

The Mayor shall develop a plan that results in a 15% reduction in energy use by each District agency and instrumentality.

(b)

The plan shall:

(1)

Include specific recommendations on implementation, including the resources and the time period required to implement the plan;

(2)

Be submitted to the Council on or before December 31, 2009; and

(3)

Consider all sources of energy.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1111, 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1111 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1111 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 1110 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle L of title I of the act may be cited as the “Energy Reduction Planning Act of 2009”.